Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.020

Powers and duties—Licensing.

In addition to other powers and duties granted to the department, the director of licensing shall administer all laws with respect to the examination of applicants for, and the issuance of, licenses to persons to engage in any business, profession, trade, occupation, or activity except for health professions.

[ 1999 c 240 s 1; 1994 c 92 s 496; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 314; 1979 c 158 s 95; 1965 c 100 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.24.020. Prior: (i) 1921 c 7 s 96; RRS s 10854. (ii) 1921 c 7 s 104; RRS s 10862. (iii) 1929 c 133 s 1; RRS s 5852-24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Powers, duties and functions of director and department of licensing: Chapter 46.01 RCW.